Washington statutes.
RCW 11.99.020

Savings clause—Rights not affected.

No act done in any proceeding commenced before this title takes effect and no accrued right shall be impaired by its provisions. When a right is acquired, extinguished or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time which has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute in force before this title takes effect, such provisions shall remain in force and be deemed a part of this code with respect to such right.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.99.020.]